Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XVIII.] HAWAII INTERAGENCY COUNCIL ON HOMELESSNESS

Note

Establishment of designated safe facilities for overnight
stays. L 2012, c 105, §4.

[§346-381] Hawaii interagency council on
homelessness; establishment. (a) There is established the Hawaii
interagency council on homelessness, which shall be an advisory body exempt
from section 26-34. The Hawaii interagency council on homelessness shall be
established within the department of human services for administrative
purposes.

(b) The Hawaii interagency council on
homelessness shall:

(1) Serve as the statewide homelessness planning and
policy development entity with broad representation from state and county
government and the community;

(2) Formulate, and advise the governor on the implementation
of, a unified ten-year statewide plan to address homelessness in all Hawaii
counties;

(3) Facilitate the acquisition of funding and
resources for state and county homeless programs;

(4) Recommend policy, regulatory, and statutory
changes, and identify resource strategies for the successful execution of the
ten-year plan;

(5) Assemble accurate fiscal and demographic
information to support policy development and track outcomes;

(6) Consider collaborative homelessness initiatives
of other states that have demonstrated positive measurable outcomes as possible
models for state and local programs;

(7) Promote systems integration of social, health,
training, and housing services to reduce duplication among homeless assistance
programs;

(8) Advise on the development and implementation of a
public education program on homelessness in Hawaii and disseminate information
including data and best practices; and

(9) Report annually to the governor, the legislature,
and the mayor of each county on the progress of its activities, including
formulation and progress of the ten-year plan no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session.

(c) The ten-year statewide plan developed by
the Hawaii interagency council on homelessness shall:

(1) Assist individuals who are homeless or facing
homelessness;

(2) Prioritize the needs of the most vulnerable
individuals and families;

(3) Encourage and promote partnerships between public
and private entities to identify, renovate, and secure dignified transitional
and permanent housing options;

(4) Promote development and utilization of support
services, including job training, mental health, and substance abuse treatment,
that will enhance the transition out of homelessness;

(5) Increase access to public areas for all members
of the community;

(6) Support efforts to obtain accurate statistics on
homeless persons; and

(7) Activate, coordinate, and maintain responsive
action among the public, business, and faith-based communities to become part
of the homelessness solution strategy. [L 2012, c 105, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next